Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1217
Unlawful sale of explosives; penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly and intentionally sells, transfers, issues, or gives any explosive materials to any person who does not display a valid permit issued by the Nebraska State Patrol authorizing the storage or use of such explosive materials or, in the case of a business enterprise, a permit to purchase such explosive materials commits the offense of unlawful sale of explosives.

(2) Unlawful sale of explosives is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 249;

Laws 1986, LB 975, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 4.